Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 23.1-3100.
Governing boards of educational institutions; removal of members.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor may remove from office for malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, or gross neglect of duty any member of the board of any educational institution established pursuant to this chapter and fill the vacancy resulting from the removal. Each appointment to fill a vacancy is subject to confirmation by the General Assembly.

The Governor shall set forth in a written public statement his reasons for removing any member pursuant to subsection A at the time the removal occurs. The Governor is the sole judge of the sufficiency of the cause for removal as set forth in subsection A.

History.

2016, c. 588.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2016.